California statutes. Penal Code
The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any instrument or device that is possessed by a federal, state, or local historical society, museum, or institutional collection that is open to the public if all of the following conditions are satisfied: 

(a) The instrument or device is properly housed. 

(b) The instrument or device is secured from unauthorized handling. 

(c) If the instrument or device is a firearm, it is unloaded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17720.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any instrument or device, other than a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun, which is possessed or used during the course of a motion picture, television, or video production or entertainment event by an authorized participant therein in the course of making that production or event or by an authorized employee or agent of the entity producing that production or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17725.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any instrument or device, other than a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun, which is sold by, manufactured by, exposed or kept for sale by, possessed by, imported by, or lent by a person who is in the business of selling instruments or devices listed in Section 16590 solely to the entities referred to in Sections 17715 and 17720 when engaging in transactions with those entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17730.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any of the following: 

(a) The sale to, possession of, or purchase of any weapon, device, or ammunition, other than a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun, by any federal, state, county, city and county, or city agency that is charged with the enforcement of any law for use in the discharge of its official duties. 

(b) The possession of any weapon, device, or ammunition, other than a short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun, by any peace officer of any federal, state, county, city and county, or city agency that is charged with the enforcement of any law, when the officer is on duty
 and the use is authorized by the agency and is within the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(c) Any weapon, device, or ammunition, other than a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun, that is sold by, manufactured by, exposed or kept for sale by, possessed by, imported by, or lent by, any person who is in the business of selling weapons, devices, and ammunition listed in Section 16590 solely to the entities referred to in subdivision (a) when engaging in transactions with those entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17735.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any instrument, ammunition, weapon, or device that is not a firearm and is found and possessed by a person who meets all of the following: 

(a) The person is not prohibited from possessing firearms or ammunition under subdivision (a) of Section 30305 or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 

(b) The person possessed the instrument, ammunition, weapon, or device no longer than was necessary to deliver or transport it to a law enforcement agency for that
 agency’s disposition according to law. 

(c) If the person is transporting the item, the person is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17740.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any firearm, other than a short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun, which is found and possessed by a person who meets all of the following: 

(a) The person is not prohibited from possessing firearms or ammunition under subdivision (a) of Section 30305 or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The person possessed the firearm no longer than was necessary to deliver or transport it to a law enforcement agency for that agency’s disposition
 according to law.

(c) If the person is transporting the firearm, the person is transporting it to a law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(d) Before transporting the firearm to a law enforcement agency, the person has given prior notice to that law enforcement agency that the person is transporting the firearm to that law enforcement agency for disposition according to law.

(e) The firearm is transported in a locked container as defined in Section 16850.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17745.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to the possession of any weapon, device, or ammunition by a forensic laboratory or by any authorized agent or employee thereof in the course and scope of the person’s authorized activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Miscellaneous Provisions [17800. - 17800.]

17800.

For purposes of the provisions listed in Section 16590, a violation as to each firearm, weapon, or device enumerated in any of those provisions shall constitute a distinct and separate offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 3. SURRENDER, DISPOSAL, AND ENJOINING OF WEAPONS CONSTITUTING A NUISANCE [18000. - 18010.]

18000.

(a) Any weapon described in Section 19190, 21390, 21590, 25700, 26110, or 26395, or, upon conviction of the defendant or upon a juvenile court finding that an offense that would be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult was committed or attempted by the juvenile with the use of a firearm, any weapon described in Section 29300, shall be surrendered to one of the following:

(1) The sheriff of a county.

(2) The chief of police or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county.

(3) The chief of police of any campus of the University of
 California or the California State University.

(4) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) For purposes of this section, the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall receive only weapons that were confiscated by a member of the California Highway Patrol.

(c) A finding that the defendant was guilty of the offense but was insane at the time the offense was committed is a conviction for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.   (AB 2739)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

(a) An officer to whom a weapon is surrendered under Section 18000, except upon the certificate of a judge of a court of record, or of the district attorney of the county, that the retention thereof is necessary or proper to the ends of justice, shall destroy that weapon and, if applicable, submit proof of its destruction to the court.

(b) If any weapon has been stolen and is thereafter recovered from the thief or the thief’s transferee, or is used in a manner as to constitute a nuisance under Section 19190, 21390, 21590, 25700, 26110, 26395, or 29300,
 without the prior knowledge of its lawful owner that it would be so used, it shall not be destroyed pursuant to subdivision (a) but shall be restored to the lawful owner, as soon as its use as evidence has been served, upon the lawful owner’s identification of the weapon and proof of ownership, and after the law enforcement agency has complied with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4.

(c) No stolen weapon shall be destroyed pursuant to subdivision (a) unless reasonable notice is given to its lawful owner, if the lawful owner’s identity and address can be reasonably ascertained.

(d) If the weapon was evidence in a criminal case, the weapon shall be retained as required by Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1417) of Title 10 of Part 2.

(e) (1) Every law enforcement agency shall develop and maintain a written policy on the destruction of firearms and other weapons including, without limitation, policies for identifying firearms and other weapons that are required to be destroyed, keeping records of those firearms and other weapons, including entry into the Automated Firearms System, as applicable, and the destruction and disposal of those firearms and other weapons. A law enforcement agency that either contracts with, or operates under, a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with another agency for the storage or destruction of weapons or other firearms shall have a policy identifying the other agency and outlining the responsibilities of both agencies under the contract or MOU.

(2) Every law enforcement agency shall post the policy required by this subdivision on its internet website.

(f) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Destroy” means to destroy a firearm or other weapon in its entirety by smelting, shredding, crushing, or cutting and shall include all parts including, without limitation, the frame or receiver, barrel, bolt, and grip of a firearm, as applicable, and any attachments including, but not limited to, a sight, scope, silencer, or suppressor, as applicable.

(2) “Law enforcement agency” means any police department, sheriffs’ department, or other department or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer as described in Section 830.

(g) (1) If a law enforcement agency contracts with a third party for the destruction of
 firearms or other weapons pursuant to this section or any other related law, the agency shall ensure that any such contract explicitly prohibits the sale of any firearm or weapon, or any part or attachment thereof.

(2) This subdivision is not intended to prohibit the recycling, or sale for the purpose of recycling, of any scrap metal or other material resulting from the destruction of a firearm or other weapon.

(h) A law enforcement agency that had an existing contract with another person or entity for the destruction of firearms or other weapons prior to November 1, 2024, is not required to destroy a weapon pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (e) or (f) if any of those requirements would require the law enforcement agency to breach its contract with the other person or entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18010.

(a) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring an action to enjoin the manufacture of, importation of, keeping for sale of, offering or exposing for sale, giving, lending, or possession of, any item that constitutes a nuisance under any of the following provisions:

(1) Section 19290, relating to metal handgrenades.

(2) Section 20390, relating to an air gauge knife.

(3) Section 20490, relating to a belt buckle knife.

(4) Section 20590, relating to a cane sword.

(5) Section 20690, relating to a lipstick case knife.

(6) Section 20790, relating to a shobi-zue.

(7) Section 20990, relating to a writing pen knife.

(8) Section 21190, relating to a ballistic knife.

(9) Section 21890, relating to metal knuckles.

(10) Section 22290, relating to a leaded cane or an instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a billy, blackjack, sandbag, sandclub, sap, or slungshot.

(11) Section 22490, relating to a shuriken.

(12) Section 24390, relating to a camouflaging firearm container.

(13) Section 24490, relating to a cane gun.

(14) Section 24590, relating to a firearm not immediately recognizable as a firearm.

(15) Section 24690, relating to an undetectable firearm.

(16) Section 24790, relating to a wallet gun.

(17) Section 30290, relating to flechette dart ammunition and to a bullet with an explosive agent.

(18) Section 31590, relating to an unconventional pistol.

(19) Section 32390, relating
 to a large-capacity magazine.

(20) Section 32990, relating to a multiburst trigger activator.

(21) Section 33290, relating to a short-barreled rifle or a short-barreled shotgun.

(22) Section 33690, relating to a zip gun.

(b) The weapons described in subdivision (a) shall be subject to confiscation and summary destruction whenever found within the state.

(c) The weapons described in subdivision (a) shall be destroyed in the same manner described in Section 18005, except that upon the certification of a judge or of the district attorney that the ends of justice will be served thereby, the weapon shall be
 preserved until the necessity for its use ceases.

(d) (1) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring an action to enjoin the importation into the state or sale or transfer of any firearm precursor part that is unlawfully imported into this state or sold or transferred within this state.

(2) Any firearm precursor parts that are unlawfully imported in this state or unlawfully sold, transferred, or possessed within this state are a nuisance and are subject to confiscation and destruction pursuant to Section 18005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 10.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 3.2. Gun Violence Restraining Orders [18100. - 18225.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [18100. - 18123.]

18100.

(a) A gun violence restraining order is an order, in writing, signed by the court, prohibiting and enjoining a named person from having in his or her custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving any firearms or ammunition. This division establishes a civil restraining order process to accomplish that purpose.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the term “ammunition” includes a “magazine” as defined in Section 16890.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 898, Sec. 3.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18105.

The Judicial Council shall prescribe the form of the petitions and orders and any other documents, and shall promulgate any rules of court, necessary to implement this division. These forms, orders, and documents shall refer to any order issued pursuant to this chapter as a gun violence restraining order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 898, Sec. 4.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18107.

A petition for a gun violence restraining order shall describe the number, types, and locations of any firearms and ammunition presently believed by the petitioner to be possessed or controlled by the subject of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------

18108.

(a) Each municipal police department and county sheriff’s department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University Police Departments shall, on or before January 1, 2021, develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards relating to gun violence restraining orders. The policies and standards shall be updated, as necessary, to incorporate changes in the law governing gun violence restraining orders.

(b) (1) The policies and standards shall instruct officers on the use of gun violence restraining orders in appropriate situations to prevent future violence involving a firearm and shall
 encourage the use of de-escalation practices for officer and civilian safety when responding to incidents involving a firearm.

(2) The policies and standards shall instruct officers on the types of evidence a court considers in determining whether grounds exist for issuance of a gun violence restraining order pursuant to Section 18155.

(3) The policies and standards shall instruct officers to consider whether a gun violence restraining order may be necessary during a response to any residence that is associated with a firearm registration or record, during a response in which a firearm is present, or during a response in which one of the involved parties owns or possesses a firearm, or expressed an intent to acquire a firearm. The policies and standards should also inform
 officers about the different procedures and protections afforded by different types of firearm-prohibiting emergency protective orders that are available to law enforcement petitioners and provide examples of situations in which each type of emergency protective order is most appropriate.

(4) The policies and standards should also instruct officers to consider whether a gun violence restraining order may be necessary during a contact with a person exhibiting mental health issues, including suicidal thoughts, statements, or actions, if that person owns or possesses a firearm or expressed an intent to acquire a firearm. The policies and standards shall encourage officers encountering situations in which there is reasonable cause to believe that the person poses an immediate and present danger of causing personal injury to themselves or
 another person by having custody or control of a firearm to consider obtaining a mental health evaluation of the person by a medically trained professional or to detain the person for mental health evaluation pursuant to agency policy relating to Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The policies and standards should reflect the policy of the agency to prevent access to firearms by persons who, due to mental health issues, pose a danger to themselves or to others by owning or possessing a firearm. The policies and standards should encourage officers to provide information about mental health referral services during a contact with a person exhibiting mental health issues.

(c) The written policies and standards developed pursuant to this section shall be consistent with any gun violence restraining order training
 administered by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and shall include all of the following:

(1) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order, including standards and procedures for determining prior to the expiration of a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order whether the subject of the temporary emergency gun violence restraining order presents an ongoing increased risk for violence so that a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing may be necessary.

(2) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving an ex parte gun violence restraining order, including standards and procedures for determining prior to the expiration of an ex parte gun violence restraining
 order whether the subject of the ex parte gun violence restraining order presents an ongoing increased risk for violence so that a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing may be necessary.

(3) Standards and procedures for requesting and serving a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and hearing.

(4) Standards and procedures for the seizure of firearms and ammunition at the time of issuance of a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order.

(5) Standards and procedures for verifying or ensuring the removal of firearms and ammunition from the subject of a gun violence restraining order.

(6) Standards and procedures for
 obtaining and serving a search warrant for firearms and ammunition.

(7) Responsibility of officers to attend gun violence restraining order hearings and diligently participate in the evidence presentation process.

(8) Standards and procedures for requesting renewals of expiring gun violence restraining orders.

(9) Standards and procedures for storing firearms surrendered pursuant to a gun violence restraining order.

(10) Standards and procedures for returning firearms upon the termination of a gun violence restraining order, including verification that the respondent is not otherwise legally prohibited from possessing firearms.

(11) Standards and procedures for addressing violations of a gun violence restraining order.

(d) Municipal police departments, county sheriff’s departments, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University Police Departments are encouraged, but not required by this section, to train officers on standards and procedures implemented pursuant to this section, and may incorporate these standards and procedures into an academy course, preexisting annual training, or other continuing education program. Municipal police departments, county sheriff’s departments, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University police departments shall make information about
 standards and policies implemented pursuant to this section available to all officers.

(e) In developing and updating these policies and standards, law enforcement agencies are encouraged to consult with gun violence prevention experts, mental health professionals, domestic violence service providers, and other community-based organizations.

(f) Policies developed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 62.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18109.

(a) This division does not require a law enforcement agency or a law enforcement officer to seek a gun violence restraining order in any case, including, but not limited to, in a case in which the agency or officer concludes, after investigation, that the criteria for issuance of a gun violence restraining order are not satisfied.

(b) A petition brought by a law enforcement officer may be made in the name of the law enforcement agency in which the officer is employed.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18110.

Prior to a hearing on the issuance, renewal, or termination of an order under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170), the court shall ensure that a search as described in subdivision (a) of Section 6306 of the Family Code is conducted. After issuing its ruling, the court shall provide the advisement described in subdivision (c) of Section 6306 of the Family Code and shall keep information obtained from a search conducted pursuant to this section confidential in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 6306 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------

18115.

(a) The court shall notify the Department of Justice when a gun violence restraining order has been issued or renewed under this division no later than one court day after issuing or renewing the order.

(b) The court shall notify the Department of Justice when a gun violence restraining order has been dissolved or terminated under this division no later than five court days after dissolving or terminating the order. Upon receipt of either a notice of dissolution or a notice of termination of a gun violence restraining order, the Department of Justice shall, within 15 days, document the updated status of any order issued under this division.

(c) The notices required to be submitted to the Department of Justice pursuant to this section shall be submitted in an electronic format, in a manner prescribed by the department.

(d) When notifying the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the court shall indicate in the notice whether the person subject to the gun violence restraining order has filed a relinquishment of firearm rights pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 18175 or was present in court to be informed of the contents of the order or if the person failed to appear. The person’s filing of relinquishment of firearm rights or the person’s presence in court constitutes proof of service of notice of the terms of the order.

(e) (1) Within one business day of service, a law
 enforcement officer who served a gun violence restraining order shall submit the proof of service directly into the California Restraining and Protective Order System, including their name and law enforcement agency, and shall transmit the original proof of service form to the issuing court.

(2) Within one business day of receipt of proof of service by a person other than a law enforcement officer, the clerk of the court shall submit the proof of service of a gun violence restraining order directly into the California Restraining and Protective Order System, including the name of the person who served the order. If the court is unable to provide this notification to the Department of Justice by electronic transmission, the court shall, within one business day of receipt, transmit a copy of the proof of service to a local law
 enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency shall submit the proof of service directly into the California Restraining and Protective Order System within one business day of receipt from the court.

(3) Within one business day of issuance of a gun violence restraining order based on a relinquishment of firearm rights pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 18175, the clerk of the court shall enter the relinquishment of firearm rights form directly into the California Restraining and Protective Order System. If the court is unable to provide this notification to the Department of Justice by electronic transmission, the court shall, within one business day of receipt, transmit a copy of the relinquishment of firearm rights form to a local law enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency shall submit the relinquishment of firearm rights
 form directly into the California Restraining and Protective Order System within one business day of receipt from the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.   (AB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18120.

(a) A person subject to a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to this division shall not have in the person’s custody or control, own, purchase, possess, or receive any firearms or ammunition while that order is in effect.

(b) (1) Upon issuance of a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to this division, the court shall order the restrained person to surrender all firearms and ammunition in the restrained person’s custody or control, or which the restrained person possesses or owns pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The surrender ordered pursuant to paragraph (1) shall occur by immediately surrendering all firearms and ammunition in a safe
 manner, upon request of a law enforcement officer, to the control of the officer, after being served with the restraining order. A law enforcement officer serving a gun violence restraining order that indicates that the restrained person possesses firearms or ammunition shall request that all firearms and ammunition be immediately surrendered.

(3) If the gun violence restraining order is issued as an ex parte order or order after notice and hearing, and is served by a person other than a law enforcement officer, and if no request is made by a law enforcement officer, the surrender shall occur within 24 hours of being served with the order, by surrendering all firearms and ammunition in a safe manner to the control of a local law enforcement agency, selling all firearms and ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer, or transferring all firearms and ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer in accordance with Section 29830.

(4) The law enforcement officer or licensed firearms dealer taking possession of firearms or ammunition pursuant to this subdivision shall issue a receipt to the person surrendering the firearm or firearms or ammunition or both at the time of surrender.

(5) A person ordered to surrender all firearms and ammunition pursuant to this subdivision shall, within 48 hours after being served with the order, do both of the following:

(A) File with the court that issued the gun violence restraining order the original receipt showing all firearms and ammunition have been surrendered to a local law enforcement agency or sold or transferred to a licensed firearms dealer. Failure to timely file a receipt shall constitute a violation of the restraining order.

(B) File a
 copy of the receipt described in subparagraph (A) with the law enforcement agency, if any, that served the gun violence restraining order. Failure to timely file a copy of the receipt shall constitute a violation of the restraining order.

(6) When issuing an order pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall provide the respondent with information on how any firearms or ammunition still in the restrained party’s possession are to be relinquished, according to local procedures, and the process for submitting a receipt to the court showing proof of relinquishment. A court holding a hearing on this matter shall review the file to determine whether the receipt has been filed and inquire of the respondent whether they have complied with the requirement. Violations of the firearms prohibition of any restraining order under this section shall be reported to the prosecuting attorney in the jurisdiction where the order has been issued within two
 business days of the court hearing unless the restrained party provides a receipt showing compliance at a subsequent hearing or by direct filing with the clerk of the court. If the person does not file a receipt with the court within 48 hours after receiving the order for a firearm in their possession, the court shall order the clerk of the court to immediately notify, by the most effective means available, appropriate law enforcement officials of the issuance and contents of a protective order, information about the firearm or ammunition, and of any other information the court deems appropriate.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), firearms or ammunition surrendered to a law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency pursuant to this section shall be retained by the law enforcement agency until the expiration of a gun violence restraining order that has been issued against the restrained person. Upon expiration
 of an order, the firearms or ammunition shall be returned to the restrained person in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4. Firearms or ammunition that are not claimed are subject to the requirements of Section 34000.

(2) A restrained person who owns firearms or ammunition that are in the custody of a law enforcement agency pursuant to this section is entitled to sell the firearms or ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer or transfer the firearms or ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer in accordance with Section 29830 if the firearm or firearms or ammunition are otherwise legal to own or possess and the restrained person otherwise has right to title of the firearm or firearms or ammunition.

(d) If a person other than the restrained person claims title to firearms or ammunition surrendered pursuant to this
 section, and the person is determined by the law enforcement agency to be the lawful owner of the firearm or firearms or ammunition, the firearm or firearms or ammunition shall be returned to the person pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4.

(e) Within one business day of receiving the receipt referred to in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the court that issued the order shall transmit a copy of the receipt to the Department of Justice in a manner and pursuant to a process prescribed by the department.

(f) If the respondent declines to relinquish possession of a firearm or ammunition based on the assertion of the right against self-incrimination, as provided by the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 15 of Article I of the California Constitution, the court may grant use immunity for the act of relinquishing the
 firearm or ammunition required under this section.

(g) (1) The relinquishment or surrender of a firearm to a law enforcement agency pursuant to this section or the return of a firearm to a person pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Section 27545.

(2) Returns of firearms or ammunition pursuant to this section shall be governed by the applicable provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 15.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18120.5.

(a) When relevant information is presented to the court at any noticed hearing that a restrained person has a firearm, the court shall consider that information to determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, whether the person subject to an order defined in Section 136.2 or Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6 has a firearm in or subject to their immediate possession or control in violation of the order.

(b) (1) In making a determination under this section, the court may consider whether the restrained person filed a firearm relinquishment, storage, or sales receipt or if an exemption from the firearm prohibition was granted.

(2) The court may make the determination at any noticed hearing where a restraining order is issued, at a subsequent review hearing, or at any subsequent hearing while the order remains in effect.

(3) If the court makes a determination that the restrained person has a firearm in violation of the order, the court must make a written record of the determination and provide a copy to any party who is present at the hearing and, upon request, to any party not present at the hearing.

(c) (1) When presented with information under subdivision (a), the court may set a review hearing to determine whether a violation of the order has taken place.

(2) The review hearing shall be held within 10 court days after the noticed hearing at which the information was presented. If the restrained person
 is not present when the court sets the review hearing, the protected person must provide notice of the review hearing to the restrained person at least two court days before the review hearing, in accordance with Section 414.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by personal service or by mail to the restrained person’s last known address.

(3) The court may for good cause extend the date of the review hearing for a reasonable period or remove it from the calendar.

(4) The court shall order the restrained person to appear at the review hearing.

(5) This section does not prohibit the court from permitting a party or witness to appear through technology that enables remote appearances, as determined by the court.

(d) The determination made pursuant to this
 section may be considered by the court in issuing an order to show cause for contempt pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1209 of the Code of Civil Procedure or an order for monetary sanctions pursuant to Section 177.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 544, Sec. 16.   (SB 899)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18121.

There is no filing fee for an application, a responsive pleading, or an order to show cause that seeks to obtain, modify, or enforce a gun violence restraining order or other order authorized by this division if the request for the other order is necessary to obtain or give effect to a gun violence restraining order or other order authorized by this division. There is no fee for a subpoena filed in connection with that application, responsive pleading, or order to show cause. There is no fee for any filings related to a petition filed pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 686, Sec. 4.   (SB 538)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

18122.

(a) (1) A court or court facility that receives petitions for any restraining order under this division or temporary gun violence restraining orders consistent with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18125) shall permit those petitions to be submitted electronically. The court or court facility shall, based on the time of receipt, act on these filings consistent with Section 18150.

(2) The request, notice of the court date, copies of the request to serve on the respondent, and the temporary restraining order, if granted, shall be provided to the petitioner electronically, unless the petitioner notes, at the time of electronic filing, that these documents
 will be picked up from the court or court facility.

(b) (1) Information regarding electronic filing and access to the court’s self-help center shall be prominently displayed on each court’s homepage.

(2) Each self-help center shall maintain and make available information related to gun violence restraining orders pursuant to this section.

(c) The Judicial Council may adopt or amend rules and forms to implement this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 30.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18123.

A party or witness may appear remotely at the hearing on a petition for a gun violence restraining order. The superior court of each county shall develop local rules and instructions for remote appearances permitted under this section, which shall be posted on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 31.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Temporary Emergency Gun Violence Restraining Order [18125. - 18148.]

18125.
